North Carolina, session 2025, SB685.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 8 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-804.2. Maintenance and acceptance guarantees for subdivision streets.
(a) To ensure proper maintenance of publicly dedicated subdivision roadways and
compliance with G.S. 160D-804 and other development regulation requirements, a county may
require posting of a maintenance guarantee, by the developer, for any publicly dedicated roadway
to be transferred for public maintenance under G.S. 136-102.6 or under any applicable municipal
ordinance.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Administering entity. – The Board of Transportation or a municipality,
whichever is applicable.
(2) Roadway system. – The State highway system or a municipal street system,
as each is defined in G.S. 136-66.1, whichever is applicable.
(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply with respect to maintenance
and acceptance guarantees:
(1) Type. – The type of maintenance and acceptance guarantee shall be at the
election of the developer. The term "maintenance and acceptance guarantee"
includes any of the following forms of guarantee:
a. Surety bond issued by any company authorized to do business in this
State.
b. Letter of credit issued by any financial institution licensed to do
business in this State.
c. Other forms of guarantee that provide equivalent security to a surety
bond or letter of credit.
(2) Use. – Maintenance and acceptance guarantees shall only be used to ensure
that a road or street meets the minimum standards set by the administering
entity prior to acceptance to the applicable roadway system. Once the road or
street meets all applicable requirements set by the administering entity, the
developer may utilize the maintenance and acceptance guarantee to meet
minimum standards for acceptance into the roadway system. If the developer
is unable, as determined by the county, to ensure the road meets minimum
*S685-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
standards for acceptance, the county may utilize the maintenance and
acceptance guarantee and bid, pursuant to Chapter 143 of the General Statutes,
for the repair of the roadway using funds from the maintenance and
acceptance guarantee in order to meet such minimum standards.
(3) Required acceptance. – If the road or street has not been accepted into the
applicable roadway system for maintenance for a period of four years after the
plat has been recorded in the office of the appropriate register of deeds, the
administering entity shall automatically accept the road or street into its
respective roadway system for maintenance.
(4) Petition. – Once the maintenance and acceptance guarantee has been used to
ensure the road or street meets the minimum standards of the respective
administering entity, the county shall submit a petition to the administering
entity for road addition to its roadway system within five days of completed
construction, in compliance with G.S. 136-102.6(d).
(5) Release. – The following apply to the return or release of any maintenance
and acceptance guarantee established under this section:
a. The maintenance and acceptance guarantee shall be returned or
released, as appropriate, including any funds not utilized, once the road
or street has been accepted for maintenance by the administering
entity, within 30 days of acceptance.
b. If the road or street is accepted pursuant to subdivision (3) of this
subsection, the maintenance and acceptance guarantee shall be
released by the county to the respective administering entity in an
amount commensurate with the reasonable costs necessary for the road
or street to meet minimum standards for acceptance into the respective
roadway system. Any funds released under this sub-subdivision may
be utilized absent any occupancy requirement.
(6) Amount. – The posted amount of the maintenance and acceptance guarantee
shall be set by the county but shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the
reasonably estimated total cost of construction for the road or street secured
by the maintenance and acceptance guarantee, as determined by the county,
of the transportation improvements at the time the guarantee is issued. If the
maintenance and acceptance guarantee is not sufficient to cover the total costs
to ensure that the road meets the standards set by the administering entity, the
county or administering entity may use other funds to supplement the cost.
When calculating the estimated total cost of construction for the road or street,
the county shall include costs for labor and materials. Where applicable, the
costs shall be based on unit pricing.
(7) Timing. – A county, at its discretion, shall require the maintenance and
acceptance guarantee to be posted either at the time the plat is recorded or
prior to recordation of the plat.
(8) Legal responsibilities. – No person shall claim any rights under or to any
maintenance and acceptance guarantee provided pursuant to this section or in
the proceeds of any such maintenance and acceptance guarantee other than the
following:
a. The county for which the maintenance and acceptance guarantee is
provided.
b. The developer at whose request or for whose benefit the maintenance
and acceptance guarantee is given.
Page 2 Senate Bill 685-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. The person or entity issuing or providing the maintenance and
acceptance guarantee at the request of or for the benefit of the
developer.
d. The administering entity, pursuant to subdivision (3) of this
subsection.
(9) Multiple guarantees. – The developer shall have the option to post one type of
a maintenance and acceptance guarantee as provided for in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, in lieu of multiple bonds, letters of credit, or other equivalent
security, for all development matters related to the same project requiring
maintenance and acceptance guarantees."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 685-First Edition Page 3